Illinois, session 104th, HB5669.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 8ordinary and contingent expenses of the Illinois Criminal 9Justice Information Authority:10OPERATIONS11Payable from General Revenue Fund:12  For Personal Services.............................4,412,30013  For State Contributions to Social Security..........327,10014  For Contractual Services..........................2,044,00015  For Travel...........................................31,20016  For Commodities......................................11,70017  For Printing..........................................5,20018  For Equipment........................................30,00019  For Electronic Data Processing......................402,40020  For Telecommunication Services......................132,70021  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................9,00022    Total                                          $7,405,600   HB5669- 2 -OMB104 00242 LAH 10242 b1    Section 10. The amount of $525,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 3Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 4for the Illinois Family Violence Coordinating Council Program. 5    Section 15. The amount of $700,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 8for all costs associated with Bullying Prevention. 9    Section 20. The amount of $275,500, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 12for all costs associated with technical assistance and 13navigation of the Grant Accountability and Transparency Act. 14    Section 25. The amount of $13,000,000, or so much thereof 15as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Criminal 16Justice Information Authority from the General Revenue Fund 17for administrative costs, awards and grants for Adult Redeploy 18and Diversion Programs. 19    Section 30. The amount of $3,000,000, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 21Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 22for the purpose of awarding grants, contracts, administrative   HB5669- 3 -OMB104 00242 LAH 10242 b1expenses and all related costs for the Safe From the Start 2Program. 3    Section 35. The amount of $16,342,700, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 5Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 6for administrative costs, awards and grants for 7Community-Based Violence Prevention Programs, including prior 8years' costs. 9    Section 40. The amount of $6,694,300, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 12for grants and administrative expenses related to Metropolitan 13Family Services' support of street intervention programming. 14    Section 45. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 15as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 16Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 17for a grant to the Safer Foundation for violence prevention 18services and any associated administrative expenses. 19    Section 50. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 21Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 22for grants to local law enforcement agencies, other first   HB5669- 4 -OMB104 00242 LAH 10242 b1responders, and co-responders for training and other allowable 2costs pursuant to the Community Partnership for Deflection and 3Addiction Treatment Act and any associated administrative 4expenses. 5    Section 55. The amount of $623,700, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 8for costs associated with implementation of the Public Act 9101-652. 10    Section 60. The amount of $1,500,000, or so much thereof 11as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 12Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 13for grants and administrative expenses associated with 14statewide deferred prosecution funding programs. 15    Section 65. The amount of $350,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 17Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 18for grants and administrative expenses associated with the Ad 19Hoc Statewide Domestic Violence Fatality Review Committee. 20    Section 70. The amount of $600,600, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 22Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority   HB5669- 5 -OMB104 00242 LAH 10242 b1for grants and administrative expenses associated with the 2Institute 2 Innovate. 3    Section 75. The amount of $3,176,200, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 5Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 6for grants and administrative expenses related to trauma 7recovery centers. 8    Section 80. The amount of $5,000,000, or so much thereof 9as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 10Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 11for grants to local law enforcement agencies related to less 12lethal devices, less lethal device training, and other 13allowable costs associated with less lethal weapon 14alternatives, and any associated administrative expenses. 15    Section 85. The amount of $5,000,000, or so much thereof 16as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 17Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 18for grants to local law enforcement agencies, other first 19responders, and co-responders for the co-responder pilot 20program as defined in Article 11, Division 1.5 of the Illinois 21Municipal Code, and any associated administrative expenses. 22    Section 90. The amount of $15,320,550, or so much thereof   HB5669- 6 -OMB104 00242 LAH 10242 b1as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 2Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 3for administrative costs and grants to the following named 4entities, in the approximate named amounts below. 5    Section 95. The sum of $6,572,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 8for the purpose of awarding grants, contracts, administrative 9expenses and all related costs. 10    Section 100. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 12fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 13for a grant to the Center for Housing and Health to be used for 14investment in the Flexible Housing Pool associated with 15transitional and permanent supportive housing for returning 16residents and any associated administrative expenses. 17    Section 105. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 19Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 20for cost associated with the InfoNet System. 21    Section 110. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 22be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to   HB5669- 7 -OMB104 00242 LAH 10242 b1the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority for cost 2associated with the Community-Based Corrections Task Force. 3    Section 115. The sum of $1,352,700, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 5Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 6for costs associated with activities in support of federal 7assistance programs administered by state and local 8governments and nonprofit organizations. 9    Section 120. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 12for grants, contracts, administrative expenses, and all other 13costs related to statewide capacity building. 14    Section 125. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 16Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 17for grants and administrative expenses of the Home Illinois 18Program, including pilot programs, to prevent and end 19homelessness in Illinois, including, but not limited to, 20homelessness prevention, emergency and transitional housing, 21rapid rehousing, outreach, and related services and supports 22for individuals at risk or experiencing homelessness, 23including homeless veterans, in the approximate amounts below:  HB5669- 8 -OMB104 00242 LAH 10242 b1  For Live Free Illinois............................2,000,0002  For Treatment Alternatives for Safe Communities...3,000,000 3    Section 130. The amount of $564,700, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, is appropriated from the ICJIA Violence 5Prevention Fund for ordinary and contingent expenses 6associated with implementation of the Illinois Criminal 7Justice Information Act. 8    Section 135. The amount of $79,600, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated from the ICJIA Violence 10Prevention Special Projects Fund to the Illinois Criminal 11Justice Information Authority for administrative costs, awards 12and grants for Adult Redeploy and Diversion Programs. 13    Section 140. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the Criminal Justice 15Information Projects Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice 16Information Authority for distribution to fund Department of 17State Police drug task forces and Metropolitan Enforcement 18Groups. 19    Section 145. The amount of $2,500,000, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Criminal Justice 21Information Projects Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice 22Information Authority for distribution of revenue pursuant to   HB5669- 9 -OMB104 00242 LAH 10242 b1Section 21.10 of the Illinois Lottery Law. 2    Section 150. The amount of $180,000,000, or so much 3thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Criminal 4Justice Information Projects Fund to the Illinois Criminal 5Justice Information Authority for administrative costs, awards 6and grants associated with the Restore, Reinvest, and Renew 7Program, including prior years' costs. 8    Section 155. The amount of $2,190,000, or so much thereof 9as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Criminal Justice 10Information Projects Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice 11Information Authority for all costs associated with research, 12analysis and evaluation of Restore, Reinvest, and Renew 13programs. 14    Section 160. The amount of $15,000,000, or so much thereof 15as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Criminal Justice 16Information Projects Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice 17Information Authority for grants and administrative expenses 18associated with implementation of the Illinois Criminal 19Justice Information Act, including prior years' costs. 20    Section 165. The following named amounts, or so much 21thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Illinois 22Criminal Justice Information Authority for awards and grants   HB5669- 10 -OMB104 00242 LAH 10242 b1and other monies received from federal agencies, from other 2units of government, and from private/not-for-profit 3organizations for activities undertaken in support of 4investigating issues in criminal justice and for undertaking 5other criminal justice information projects:6Payable from the Criminal Justice 7 Trust Fund.........................................1,700,0008Payable from the Criminal Justice 9 Information Projects Fund..........................1,215,30010    Total                                          $2,915,300 11    Section 170. The following named amounts, or so much 12thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Illinois 13Criminal Justice Information Authority for activities 14undertaken in support of federal assistance programs 15administered by units of state and local government and 16non-profit organizations:17Payable from the Criminal Justice 18 Trust Fund.........................................7,000,000 19    Section 175. The amount of $4,000,000, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Criminal Justice 21Trust Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information 22Authority for its ordinary and contingent expenses. 23    Section 180. The amount of $140,000,000, or so much   HB5669- 11 -OMB104 00242 LAH 10242 b1thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Criminal 2Justice Trust Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice 3Information Authority for awards and grants to local units of 4government, state agencies and non-profit organizations. 5    Section 185. The following named amounts, or so much 6thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the Illinois 8Criminal Justice Information Authority for the training of law 9enforcement personnel and services for families of victims of 10homicide or murder:11Payable from the Death Penalty Abolition Fund:12  For operational expenses............................874,30013  For Awards and Grants to Local Units of14   Government, State Agencies and Non-Profit15   Organizations for Training of Law16   Enforcement Personnel and Services17   for Families of Victims of18   Homicide or Murder...............................4,000,00019    Total                                          $4,874,300 20    Section 190. The amount of $20,000,000, or so much thereof 21as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Violent Crime 22Witness Protection Program Fund to the Illinois Criminal 23Justice Information Authority for grants and administrative 24expenses associated with the Violent Crime Witness Protection   HB5669- 12 -OMB104 00242 LAH 10242 b1Act and the Crime Reduction Task Force Act. 2    Section 195. The amount of $7,800, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois State 4Crime Stoppers Association Fund to the Illinois Criminal 5Justice Information Authority for grants to enhance and 6develop Crime Stoppers program in Illinois. 7ARTICLE 28    Section 5. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 9be necessary and remains unexpected at the close of business 10on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore made for 11such purpose in Article 122, Section 1390 of Public Act 12104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 13Illinois' Future to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information 14Authority for a grant to Elite Community Outreach, Inc. for 15operational expenses. 16    Section 10. The amount of $4,836,051, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary and remains unexpected at the close of 18business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 19made for such purpose in Article 83, Section 125 of Public Act 20104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 21Illinois' Future to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information 22Authority for a grant to Acclivus for costs associated with   HB5669- 13 -OMB104 00242 LAH 10242 b1operating expenses. 2ARTICLE 33    Section 5. The sum of $2,780,140, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 5on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for 6such purposes in Article 123, Section 235 of Public Act 7104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 8Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the Illinois 9Criminal Justice Information Authority for grants and 10administrative expenses associated with implementing violence 11prevention programs, including but not limited to, for 12purposes permitted by Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan 13Act of 2021 and any associated federal guidance, including 14prior years' costs. 15    Section 10. The amount of $313,960, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 17business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore 18made for such purposes in Article 123, Section 240 of Public 19Act 104-0003, as amended, is appropriated from the State 20Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the Illinois 21Criminal Justice Information Authority for a grant and 22administrative costs to Waukegan School District #60, 23including but not limited to, for purposes permitted by   HB5669- 14 -OMB104 00242 LAH 10242 b1Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and 2related federal guidance, including prior years' costs. 3    Section 15. The sum of $800,000, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 5on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for 6such purpose in Article 123, Section 245 of Public Act 7104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 8Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the Illinois 9Criminal Justice Information Authority for a grant and 10administrative costs to Earhart Elementary School, including 11but not limited to, for purposes allowed by Section 9901 of the 12American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and any associated federal 13guidance, including prior years' costs. 14    Section 20. The sum of $260,300, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 16on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for 17such purposes in Article 123, Section 250 of Public Act 18104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 19Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the Illinois 20Criminal Justice Information Authority for a grant and 21administrative costs to Dulles Elementary School, including 22but not limited to, for purposes allowed by Section 9901 of the 23American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and any associated federal 24guidance, including prior years' costs.   HB5669- 15 -OMB104 00242 LAH 10242 b1    Section 25. The sum of $216,490, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 3on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for 4such purposes in Article 123, Section 255 of Public Act 5104-0003, as amended is reappropriated from the State 6Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the Illinois 7Criminal Justice Information Authority for a grant and 8administrative costs to St. Bernard Hospital, including but 9not limited to, for purposes allowed by Section 9901 of the 10American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and any associated federal 11guidance, including prior years' costs. 12    Section 30. The amount of $7,391,077, or so much thereof 13as may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 14business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore 15made for such purposes in Article 123, Section 260 of Public 16Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 17Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the Illinois 18Criminal Justice Information Authority for administrative 19costs and grants to the following named entities, including 20but not limited to, for purposes allowed by Section 9901 of the 21American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and any associated federal 22guidance, including prior years' costs. The combined cost of 23grants and administrative expenses associated with each grant 24shall equal the approximate amounts below.   HB5669- 16 -OMB104 00242 LAH 10242 b1    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 22026.